California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(6) For purposes of the definition of “nonminor dependent” pursuant to subdivision (v) of Section 11400, an order for foster care placement made at disposition pursuant to this subdivision shall be treated as though the nonminor attained 18 years of age while under an order of foster care placement by the juvenile court.

(7) Implementation of this subdivision is subject to federal approval of the state plan amendment made under Title IV-E of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 670 et seq.), and shall be operative as of the date of federal approval.

(8) On or before July 1, 2020, the Judicial Council shall amend or adopt rules of court, and shall develop or amend appropriate forms, as necessary to implement this subdivision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 682, Sec. 1.   (AB 748)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

358.1.

Each social study or evaluation made by a social worker or child advocate appointed by the court, required to be received in evidence pursuant to Section 358, shall include, but not be limited to, a factual discussion of each of the following subjects:

(a) Whether the county welfare department or social worker has considered either of the following:

(1) Child protective services, as defined in Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 16500) of Part 4 of Division 9, as a possible solution to the problems at hand, and has offered these services to qualified parents if appropriate under the circumstances.

(2) Whether the child can be returned to the custody of the
 child’s parent who is enrolled in a certified substance abuse treatment facility that allows a dependent child to reside with the child’s parent.

(b) What plan, if any, for return of the child to the child’s parents and for achieving legal permanence for the child if efforts to reunify fail, is recommended to the court by the county welfare department or probation officer.

(c) Whether the best interest of the child will be served by granting reasonable visitation rights with the child to the child’s grandparents, in order to maintain and strengthen the child’s family relationships.

(d) (1) Whether the child has siblings under the court’s jurisdiction, and, if any siblings exist, all of the following:

(A) The nature of the
 relationship between the child and the child’s siblings.

(B) The appropriateness of developing or maintaining the sibling relationships pursuant to Section 16002.

(C) If the siblings are not placed together in the same home, why the siblings are not placed together and what efforts are being made to place the siblings together, or why those efforts are not appropriate.

(D) If the siblings are not placed together, all of the following:

(i) The frequency and nature of the visits between the siblings.

(ii) If there are visits between the siblings, whether the visits are supervised or unsupervised. If the visits are supervised, a discussion of the reasons why the visits are supervised, and
 what needs to be accomplished in order for the visits to be unsupervised.

(iii) If there are visits between the siblings, a description of the location and length of the visits.

(iv) Any plan to increase visitation between the siblings.

(E) The impact of the sibling relationships on the child’s placement and planning for legal permanence.

(2) The factual discussion shall include a discussion of indicators of the nature of the child’s sibling relationships, including, but not limited to, whether the siblings were raised together in the same home, whether the siblings have shared significant common experiences or have existing close and strong bonds, whether either sibling expresses a desire to visit or live with another sibling, as applicable, and
 whether ongoing contact is in the child’s best emotional interest.

(e) If the parent or guardian is unwilling or unable to participate in making an educational decision for their child, or if other circumstances exist that compromise the ability of the parent or guardian to make educational decisions for the child, the county welfare department or social worker shall consider whether the right of the parent or guardian to make educational decisions for the child should be limited. If the study or evaluation makes that recommendation, it shall identify whether there is a responsible adult available to make educational decisions for the child pursuant to Section 361.

(f) Whether the child appears to be a person who is eligible to be considered for further court action to free the child from parental custody and control.

(g) Whether the parent has been advised of the child’s option to participate in adoption planning, including the option to enter into a postadoption contact agreement as described in Section 8616.5 of the Family Code, and to voluntarily relinquish the child for adoption if an adoption agency is willing to accept the relinquishment.

(h) The appropriateness of any relative placement pursuant to Section 361.3. However, this consideration may not be cause for continuance of the dispositional hearing.

(i) Whether the caregiver desires, and is willing, to provide legal permanency for the child if reunification is unsuccessful.

(j) For an Indian child, in consultation with the Indian child’s tribe, whether tribal customary adoption is an appropriate permanent plan for the child if reunification is
 unsuccessful.

(k) On and after the date that the director executes a declaration pursuant to Section 11217, whether the child has been placed in an approved relative’s home under a voluntary placement agreement for a period not to exceed 180 days, the parent or guardian is not interested in additional family maintenance or family reunification services, and the relative desires and is willing to be appointed the child’s legal guardian.

(l) For a placement made on or after October 1, 2021, if the child has been placed in a short-term residential therapeutic program, the social study shall include the information specified in subdivision (c) of Section 361.22.

(m) For a placement made on or after July 1, 2022, if the child has been
 placed in a community treatment facility, the social study shall include the information specified in subdivision (c) of Section 361.22.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 50, Sec. 16.   (SB 187)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

358.2.

The court report prepared pursuant to Section 358.1 shall include a copy of each child and family team action plan, as required by subparagraph (B) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (a) of Section 16501, that is completed on or after January 1, 2026, and was not previously provided to the court.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 79, Sec. 3.   (SB 119)   Effective July 29, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

359.

(a) Whenever a minor who appears to be a danger to himself or others as a result of the use of narcotics, as defined in Section 11019 of the Health and Safety Code, or a restricted dangerous drug (as defined in former Section 11901 of the Health and Safety Code), is brought before any judge of the juvenile court, the judge may continue the hearing and proceed pursuant to this section. The court may order the minor taken to a facility designated by the county and approved by the State Department of Health Care Services as a facility for 72-hour treatment and evaluation. Thereupon the provisions of Section 11922 of the Health and Safety Code shall apply, except that the professional person in charge of the facility shall make a written report to the court concerning the results of the
 evaluation of the minor.

(b) If the professional person in charge of the facility for 72-hour evaluation and treatment reports to the juvenile court that the minor is not a danger to himself or others as a result of the use of narcotics or restricted dangerous drugs or that the minor does not require 14-day intensive treatment, or if the minor has been certified for not more than 14 days of intensive treatment and the certification is terminated, the minor shall be released if the juvenile court proceedings have been dismissed; referred for further care and treatment on a voluntary basis, subject to the disposition of the juvenile court proceedings; or returned to the juvenile court, in which event the court shall proceed with the case pursuant to this chapter.

(c) Any expenditure for the evaluation or intensive treatment of a minor under this section shall be considered an
 expenditure made under Part 2 (commencing with Section 5600) of Division 5, and shall be reimbursed by the state as are other local expenditures pursuant to that part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 23, Sec. 27.   (AB 82)   Effective June 27, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10. Dependent Children—Judgments and Orders [360. - 371.]

360.

After receiving and considering the evidence on the proper disposition of the case, the juvenile court may enter judgment as follows:

(a) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, if the court finds that the child is a person described by Section 300 and the parent has advised the court that the parent is not interested in family maintenance or family reunification services and has executed a written waiver of any of those services, the court may, in addition to or in lieu of adjudicating the child a dependent child of the court, order a legal guardianship, appoint a legal guardian, and issue letters of guardianship, if the court determines that a guardianship is in the best interest of the
 child, provided the parent and the child agree to the guardianship, unless the child’s age or physical, emotional, or mental condition prevents the child’s meaningful response. The court shall advise the parent and the child that reunification services will not be provided as a result of the establishment of a guardianship. The proceeding for the appointment of a guardian shall be in the juvenile court.

(2) If the parent designates a specific person to be the child’s
 guardian, and the child, or the child’s legal counsel if the child is under 12 years of age, does not object to that person’s appointment, and if the court finds that the proposed guardian agrees to the appointment as the child’s guardian, as well as all the rights and responsibilities of being a legal guardian, the court shall appoint the proposed guardian, unless it finds by a preponderance of the evidence that the person’s appointment would be contrary to the best interests of the child. The assessment under subdivision (g) of Section 361.5 shall be considered in determining the best interest of the child. If the child is an Indian child, as defined in Section 224.1, placement preferences shall be applied according to Section 361.31.

(3) Any application for termination of guardianship shall be filed in juvenile court in a
 form as may be developed by the Judicial Council pursuant to Section 68511 of the Government Code. Sections 366.4 and 388 shall apply to this order of guardianship.

(4) A person shall not be appointed a legal guardian under this section until an assessment as specified in subdivision (g) of Section 361.5 is read and considered by the court and reflected in the minutes of the court.

(5) On and after the date that the director executes a declaration pursuant to Section 11217, if the court appoints an approved relative caregiver as the child’s legal guardian, the child has been in the care of that approved relative for a period of six consecutive months under a voluntary placement agreement, and the child otherwise meets the conditions for federal financial participation, the child
 shall be eligible for aid under the Kin-GAP Program as provided in Article 4.7 (commencing with Section 11385) of Chapter 2 of Part 3 of Division 9. The nonfederally eligible child placed with an approved relative caregiver who is appointed as the child’s legal guardian shall be eligible for aid under the state-funded Kin-GAP Program, as provided for in Article 4.5 (commencing with Section 11360) of Chapter 2 of Part 3 of Division 9.

(6) The person responsible for preparing the assessment may be called and examined by any party to the guardianship proceeding.

(b) If the court finds that the child is a person described by Section 300, it may, without adjudicating the child a dependent child of the court, order that services be provided to keep the family together and
 place the child and the child’s parent or guardian under the supervision of the social worker for a time period consistent with Section 301.

(c) If the family subsequently is unable or unwilling to cooperate with the services being provided, the social worker may file a petition with the juvenile court pursuant to Section 332 alleging that a previous petition has been sustained and that disposition pursuant to subdivision (b) has been ineffective in ameliorating the situation requiring the child welfare services. Upon hearing the petition, the court shall order either that the petition shall be dismissed or that a new disposition hearing shall be held pursuant to subdivision (d).

(d) If the court finds that the child is a person described by Section 300, it may order and adjudge
 the child to be a dependent child of the court.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 780, Sec. 2.   (AB 2309)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

361.

(a) (1) In all cases in which a minor is adjudged a dependent child of the court on the ground that the minor is a person described by Section 300, the court may limit the control to be exercised over the dependent child by any parent, guardian, or Indian custodian and shall by its order clearly and specifically set forth all those limitations. Any limitation on the right of the parent, guardian, or Indian custodian to make educational or developmental services decisions for the child shall be specifically addressed in the court order. The limitations may not exceed those necessary to protect the child. If the court specifically limits the right of the parent, guardian, or Indian custodian to make educational or developmental
 services decisions for the child, or, for the nonminor dependent, if the court finds the appointment of a developmental services decisionmaker to be in the best interests of the nonminor dependent, the court shall at the same time appoint a responsible adult to make educational or developmental services decisions for the child or nonminor dependent until one of the following occurs:

(A) The minor reaches 18 years of age, unless the child or nonminor dependent chooses not to make educational or developmental services decisions for themselves, or is deemed by the court to be incompetent.

(B) Another responsible adult is appointed to make educational or developmental services decisions for the minor pursuant to this section.

(C) The right of the parent, guardian, or Indian custodian to make educational or developmental services decisions for the minor is fully restored.

(D) A successor guardian or conservator is appointed.

(E) The child is placed into a planned permanent living arrangement pursuant to paragraph (5) of subdivision (g) of Section 366.21, Section 366.22, Section 366.26, or subdivision (i) of Section 366.3, at which time, for educational decisionmaking, the foster parent, relative caretaker, or nonrelative extended family member as defined in Section 362.7, has the right to represent the child in educational matters pursuant to Section 56055 of the Education Code, and for decisions relating to developmental services, unless the court specifies otherwise, the foster parent, relative
 caregiver, or nonrelative extended family member of the planned permanent living arrangement has the right to represent the child or nonminor dependent in matters related to developmental services.

(2) An individual who would have a conflict of interest in representing the child or nonminor dependent shall not be appointed to make educational or developmental services decisions. For purposes of this section, “an individual who would have a conflict of interest” means a person having any interests that might restrict or bias their ability to make educational or developmental services decisions, including, but not limited to, those conflicts of interest prohibited by Section 1126 of the Government Code, and the receipt of compensation or attorney’s fees for the provision of services pursuant to this section. A foster parent shall not be
 deemed to have a conflict of interest solely because they receive compensation for the provision of services pursuant to this section.

(3) Regardless of the person or persons currently holding the right to make educational decisions for the child, a foster parent, relative caregiver, nonrelated extended family member, or resource family shall retain rights and obligations regarding accessing and maintaining health and education information pursuant to Sections 49069.3 and 49076 of the Education Code and Section 16010 of this code.

(4) (A) If the court limits the parent’s, guardian’s, or Indian custodian’s educational rights pursuant to this subdivision, the court shall determine whether there is a responsible adult who is a relative, nonrelative extended
 family member, or other adult known to the child who is available and willing to serve as the child’s educational representative before appointing an educational representative or surrogate who is not known to the child.

(B) If the court cannot identify a responsible adult who is known to the child and available to make educational decisions for the child, subparagraphs (A) to (E), inclusive, of paragraph (1) do not apply, and the child has either been referred to the local educational agency for special education and related services, or has a valid individualized education program, the court shall refer the child to the local educational agency for appointment of a surrogate parent pursuant to Section 7579.5 of the Government Code.

(C) If the court cannot identify a responsible adult
 to make educational decisions for the child, the appointment of a surrogate parent as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 56050 of the Education Code is not warranted, and there is no foster parent to
 exercise the authority granted by Section 56055 of the Education Code, the court may, with the input of any interested person, make educational decisions for the child.

(5) (A) If the court appoints a developmental services decisionmaker pursuant to this section, they shall have the authority to access the child’s or nonminor dependent’s information and records pursuant to subdivision (u) of Section 4514 and paragraph (23) of subdivision (a) of Section 5328, and to act on the child’s or nonminor dependent’s behalf for the purposes of the individual program plan process pursuant to Sections 4646, 4646.5, and 4648 and the fair hearing process pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 4700) of Division 4.5, and as set forth in the court order.

(B) If the court cannot identify a responsible adult to make developmental services decisions for the child or nonminor dependent, the court may, with the input of any interested person, make developmental services decisions for the child or nonminor dependent. If the child is receiving services from a regional center, the provision of any developmental services related to the court’s decision must be consistent with the child’s or nonminor dependent’s individual program plan and pursuant to the provisions of the Lanterman Developmental Disabilities Services Act (Division 4.5 (commencing with Section 4500)).

(6) All educational and school placement decisions shall seek to ensure that the child is in the least restrictive educational programs and has access to the academic resources, services, and extracurricular and
 enrichment activities that are available to all pupils. In all instances, educational and school placement decisions shall be based on the best interests of the child. If an educational representative or surrogate is appointed for the child, the representative or surrogate shall meet with the child, shall investigate the child’s educational needs and whether those needs are being met, and shall, prior to each review hearing held under this article, provide information and recommendations concerning the child’s educational needs to the child’s social worker, make written recommendations to the court, or attend the hearing and participate in those portions of the hearing that concern the child’s education.

(7) Nothing in this section in any way removes the obligation to appoint surrogate parents for students with disabilities who are without
 parental representation in special education procedures as required by state and federal law, including Section 1415(b)(2) of Title 20 of the United States Code, Section 56050 of the Education Code, Section 7579.5 of the Government Code, and Rule 5.650 of the California Rules of Court.

(b) (1) Subdivision (a) does not limit the ability of a parent to voluntarily relinquish their child to the State Department of Social Services, to a county adoption agency, or to a licensed private adoption agency at any time while the child is the subject of a petition to declare them, or is, a dependent child of the juvenile court, if the department, county adoption agency, or licensed private adoption agency is willing to accept the relinquishment.

(2) When accepting the
 relinquishment of a child described in paragraph (1), the department or a county adoption agency shall comply with Section 8700 of the Family Code and, within five court days of accepting the relinquishment, shall file written notice of that fact with the court and all parties to the case and their counsel.

(3) When accepting the relinquishment of a child described in paragraph (1), a licensed private adoption agency shall comply with Section 8700 of the Family Code and, within 10 court days of accepting the relinquishment, shall file or allow another party or that party’s counsel to file with the court one original and five copies of a request to approve the relinquishment. The clerk of the court shall file the request under seal, subject to examination only by the parties and their counsel or by others upon court approval. If
 the request is accompanied by the written agreement of all parties, the court may issue an ex parte order approving the relinquishment. Unless approved pursuant to that agreement, the court shall set the matter for hearing no later than 10 court days after filing, and shall provide notice of the hearing to all parties and their counsel, and to the licensed private adoption agency and its counsel. The licensed private adoption agency and any prospective adoptive parent or parents named in the relinquishment shall be permitted to attend the hearing and participate as parties regarding the strictly limited issue of whether the court should approve the relinquishment. The court shall issue an order approving or denying the relinquishment within 10 court days after the hearing.

(4) Nothing in this subdivision suspends the requirements for voluntary
 consent to adoption under Section 8606.5 of the Family Code or adoptive placement or consent to termination of parental rights under Section 1913 of the federal Indian Child Welfare Act of 1978 (25 U.S.C. Sec. 1901 et seq.).

(c) A dependent child shall not be taken from the physical custody of their parents, guardian or guardians, or Indian custodian with whom the child resides at the time the petition was initiated, unless the juvenile court finds clear and convincing evidence of any of the following circumstances listed in paragraphs (1) to (5), inclusive, and, where it is known or there is reason to know that the child is an Indian child, as defined by Section 224.1, paragraph (6):

(1) There is or would be a substantial danger to the physical health, safety, protection, or
 physical or emotional well-being of the minor if the minor were returned home, and there are no reasonable means by which the minor’s physical health can be protected without removing the minor from the minor’s parent’s, guardian’s, or Indian custodian’s physical custody. The fact that a minor has been adjudicated a dependent child of the court pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 300 shall constitute prima facie evidence that the minor cannot be safely left in the physical custody of the parent, guardian, or Indian custodian with whom the minor resided at the time of injury. The court shall consider, as a reasonable means to protect the minor, each of the following:

(A) The option of removing an offending parent, guardian, or Indian custodian from the home.

(B) Allowing
 a nonoffending parent, guardian, or Indian custodian to retain physical custody as long as that parent, guardian, or Indian custodian presents a plan acceptable to the court demonstrating that they will be able to protect the child from future harm.

(2) The parent, guardian, or Indian custodian of the minor is unwilling to have physical custody of the minor, and the parent, guardian, or Indian custodian has been notified that if the minor remains out of their physical custody for the period specified in
 Section 366.26, the minor may be declared permanently free from their custody and control.

(3) The minor is suffering severe emotional damage, as indicated by extreme anxiety, depression, withdrawal, or untoward aggressive behavior toward themselves or others, and there are no reasonable means by which the minor’s emotional health may be protected without removing the minor from the physical custody of their parent, guardian, or Indian custodian.

(4) The minor or a sibling of the minor has been sexually abused, or is deemed to be at substantial risk of being sexually abused, by a parent, guardian, Indian custodian, or member of their household, or other person known to their parent, and there are no reasonable means by which the minor can be protected from
 further sexual abuse or a substantial risk of sexual abuse without removing the minor from their parent, guardian, or Indian custodian, or the minor does not wish to return to their parent, guardian, or Indian custodian.

(5) The minor has been left without any provision for
 their support, or a parent, guardian, or Indian custodian who has been incarcerated or institutionalized cannot arrange for the care of the minor, or a relative or other adult custodian with whom the child has been left by the parent, guardian, or Indian custodian is unwilling or unable to provide care or support for the child and the whereabouts of the parent, guardian, or Indian custodian is unknown and reasonable efforts to locate them have been unsuccessful.

(6) In an Indian child custody proceeding, continued custody of the child by the parent or Indian custodian is likely to result in serious emotional or physical damage to the child, and that finding is supported by testimony of a “qualified expert witness” as described in Section 224.6.

(A) For
 purposes of this paragraph, stipulation by the parent, Indian custodian, or the Indian child’s tribe, or failure to object, may waive the requirement of producing evidence of the likelihood of serious damage only if the court is satisfied that the party has been fully advised of the requirements under this paragraph and under subdivision (e) of Section 1912 of the federal Indian Child Welfare Act of 1978 (25 U.S.C. Sec. 1901 et seq.), and has
 knowingly, intelligently, and voluntarily waived them.

(B) For purposes of this paragraph, failure to meet non-Indian family and child-rearing community standards, or the existence of other behavior or conditions that meet the removal standards of this section, will not support an order for placement in the absence of the finding in this paragraph.

(d) A dependent child shall not be taken from the physical custody of their parents, guardian, or Indian custodian with whom the child did not reside at the time the petition was initiated, unless the juvenile court finds clear and convincing evidence that there would be a substantial danger to the physical health, safety, protection, or physical or emotional well-being of the child for the parent, guardian, or Indian
 custodian to live with the child or otherwise exercise the parent’s, guardian’s, or Indian custodian’s right to physical custody, and there are no reasonable means by which the child’s physical and emotional health can be protected without removing the child from the child’s parent’s, guardian’s, or Indian custodian’s physical custody.

(e) The court shall make a determination as to whether reasonable efforts were made to prevent or to eliminate the need for removal of the minor from their home or, if the minor is removed for one of the reasons stated in paragraph (5) of subdivision (c), whether it was reasonable under the circumstances not to make any of those efforts, or, where it is known or there is reason to know that the child is an Indian child, as defined by Section 224.1, whether active efforts, as defined by Section 224.1 and
 as required in Section 361.7 were made and that these efforts have proved unsuccessful. The court shall state the facts on which the decision to remove the minor is based.

(f) The court shall make all of the findings required by subdivision (a) of Section 366 in either of the following circumstances:

(1) The minor has been taken from the custody of their parent, guardian, or Indian custodian and has been living in an out-of-home placement pursuant to Section 319.

(2) The minor has been living in a voluntary out-of-home placement pursuant to Section 16507.4.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 656, Sec. 14.   (AB 81)   Effective September 27, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

361.1.

(a) If a child is removed from the physical custody of a parent or guardian on the ground that the child may come within the jurisdiction of the juvenile court pursuant to Section 300, the child shall be returned to the physical custody of that parent or guardian immediately after a finding by the juvenile court that the child is not a person described in Section 300, but, in any case, not more than two working days following the date of that finding, unless the parent or guardian and the agency with custody of the child agree to a later date for the child’s release. Nothing in this section shall affect a parent or guardian’s remedies when a child is not returned immediately, as those remedies existed prior to enactment of this section.

(b) The Judicial Council shall adopt a rule of court to ensure proper notice to a parent or guardian regarding the circumstances and the timeframe in which a child is required to be released from custody pursuant to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 306, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

361.2.

(a) If a court orders removal of a child pursuant to Section 361, the court shall first determine whether there is a parent of the child, with whom the child was not residing at the time that the events or conditions arose that brought the child within the provisions of Section 300, who desires to assume custody of the child. If that parent requests custody, the court shall place the child with the parent unless it finds that placement with that parent would be detrimental to the safety, protection, or physical or emotional well-being of the child. The fact that the parent is enrolled in a certified substance abuse treatment facility that allows a dependent child to reside with their parent shall not be, for that reason alone, prima facie
 evidence that placement with that parent would be detrimental.

(b) If the court places the child with that parent, the court may do any of the following:

(1) Order that the parent become legal and physical custodian of the child. The court may also provide reasonable visitation by the noncustodial parent. The court shall then terminate its jurisdiction over the child. The custody order shall continue unless modified by a subsequent order of the superior court. The order of the juvenile court shall be filed in any domestic relation proceeding between the parents.

(2) Order that the parent assume custody subject to the jurisdiction of the juvenile court and require that a home visit be conducted within three months.
 In determining whether to take the action described in this paragraph, the court shall consider any concerns that have been raised by the child’s current caregiver
 regarding the parent. After the social worker conducts the home visit and files their report with the court, the court may then take the action described in paragraph (1), (3), or this paragraph. However, this paragraph does not imply that the court is required to take the action described in this paragraph as a prerequisite to the court taking the action described in either paragraph (1) or (3).

(3) Order that the parent assume custody subject to the supervision of the juvenile court. In that case the court may order that reunification services be provided to the parent or guardian from whom the child is being removed, or the court may order that services be provided solely to the parent who is assuming physical custody in order to allow that parent to retain later custody without court supervision, or that services be provided to
 both parents, in which case the court shall determine, at review hearings held pursuant to Section 366, which parent, if either, shall have custody of the child.

(c) The court shall make a finding, either in writing or on the record, of the basis for its determination under subdivisions (a) and (b).

(d) Part 6 (commencing with Section 7950) of Division 12 of the Family Code shall apply to the placement of a child pursuant to paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (e).

(e) If the court orders removal pursuant to Section 361, the court shall order the care, custody, control, and conduct of the child to be under the supervision of the social worker who may place the child in any of the following:

(1) The home of a noncustodial parent, as described in subdivision (a), regardless of the parent’s immigration status.

(2) The approved home of a relative, or the home of a relative, or in the case of an Indian child, an extended family member as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 224.1, who has been assessed pursuant to Section 361.4 and is pending approval pursuant to Section 16519.5, regardless of the relative’s immigration status.

(3) The approved home of a nonrelative extended family member, as defined in Section 362.7, or the home of a nonrelative extended family member who has been assessed pursuant to Section 361.4 and is pending approval pursuant to Section 16519.5.

(4) The approved home of a resource family, as defined in Section 16519.5, or a home that is pending approval pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (e) of Section 16519.5.

(5) A foster home considering first a foster home in which the child has been placed before an interruption in foster care, if that placement is in the best interest of the child and space is available.

(6) If it is known or there is reason to know that the child is an Indian child, as defined by Section 224.1, a home or facility in accordance with the placement preferences contained in Section 361.31 and the federal Indian Child Welfare Act (25 U.S.C. Sec. 1901 et seq.).

(7) A suitable
 licensed community care facility, except a youth homelessness prevention center licensed by the State Department of Social Services pursuant to Section 1502.35 of the Health and Safety Code.

(8) With a foster family agency, as defined in subdivision (g) of Section 11400 and paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 1502 of the Health and Safety Code, to be placed in a suitable family home certified or approved by the agency, with prior approval of the county placing agency.

(9) A community care facility licensed as a group home for children vendored by a regional center pursuant to Section 56004 of Title 17 of the California Code of Regulations or a short-term residential therapeutic program, as defined in subdivision (ad) of Section 11400 of this code and paragraph (18) of
 subdivision (a) of Section 1502 of the Health and Safety Code. A child of any age who is placed in a community care facility licensed as a group home for children vendored by a regional center or a short-term residential therapeutic program shall have a case plan that indicates that placement is for purposes of providing short-term, specialized, and intensive treatment for the child, the case plan specifies the need for, nature of, and anticipated duration of this treatment, pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 16501.1, and the case plan includes transitioning the child to a less restrictive environment and the projected timeline by which the child will be transitioned to a less restrictive environment. Any placement longer than six months shall be documented consistent with paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 16501.1 and, unless subparagraph (A) or (B) applies to the
 child, shall be approved by the deputy director or director of the county child welfare department no less frequently than every six months.

(A) A child under six years of age shall not be placed in a community care facility licensed as a group home for children vendored by a regional center or a short-term residential therapeutic program except under the following circumstances:

(i) If the facility meets the applicable regulations adopted under Section 1530.8 of the Health and Safety Code and standards developed pursuant to Section 11467.1 of this code, and the deputy director or director of the county child welfare department has approved the case plan.

(ii) The short-term, specialized, and intensive treatment period shall
 not exceed 120 days, unless the county has made progress toward or is actively working toward implementing the case plan that identifies the services or supports necessary to transition the child to a family setting, circumstances beyond the county’s control have prevented the county from obtaining those services or supports within the timeline documented in the case plan, and the need for additional time pursuant to the case plan is documented by the caseworker and approved by a deputy director or director of the county child welfare department.

(iii) To the extent that placements pursuant to this paragraph are extended beyond an initial 120 days, the requirements of clauses (i) and (ii) shall apply to each extension. In addition, the deputy director or director of the county child welfare department shall approve the continued placement no
 less frequently than every 60 days.

(iv) In addition, if a case plan indicates that placement is for purposes of providing family reunification services, the facility shall offer family reunification services that meet the needs of the individual child and their family, permit parents, guardians, or Indian custodians to have reasonable access to their children 24 hours a day, encourage extensive parental involvement in meeting the daily needs of their children, and employ staff trained to provide family reunification services. In addition, one of the following conditions exists:

(I) The child’s parent, guardian, or Indian custodian is also under the jurisdiction of the court and resides in the facility.

(II) The
 child’s parent, guardian, or Indian custodian is participating in a treatment program affiliated with the facility and the child’s placement in the facility facilitates the coordination and provision of reunification services.
